California statutes. Insurance Code
(B) The commissioners annuity reserve valuation method for annuity contracts subject to subdivision (b) of Section 10489.12.

(C) Minimum reserves for all other policies or contracts subject to subdivision (b) of
 Section 10489.12.

(2) Which policies or contracts or types of policies or contracts are subject to the requirements of a principle-based valuation in subdivision (a) of Section 10489.97 and the minimum valuation standards consistent with those requirements.

(3) For policies and contracts subject to a principle-based valuation under Section 10489.97:

(A) Requirements for the format of reports to the commissioner under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10489.97, which shall include information necessary to determine if the valuation is appropriate and in compliance with this article.

(B) Assumptions for risks over which the company does not have significant control or influence.

(C) Procedures for corporate governance and oversight of the actuarial function, and a process for appropriate waiver or modification of those procedures.

(4) For policies not subject to a principle-based valuation under Section 10489.97, the minimum valuation standard that shall either:

(A) Be consistent with the minimum standard of valuation prior to the operative date of the valuation manual.

(B) Develop reserves that quantify the benefits and guarantees, and the funding, associated with the contracts and their risks at a level of conservatism that reflects conditions that include unfavorable events that have a reasonable probability of occurring.

(5) Other requirements, including, but not limited to, those relating to reserve methods,
 models for measuring risk, generation of economic scenarios, assumptions, margins, use of company experience, risk measurement, disclosure, certifications, reports, actuarial opinions and memorandums, transition rules, and internal controls.

(6) The data and form of the data required pursuant to Section 10489.98, with whom the data is required to be submitted, and may specify other requirements including data analyses and reporting of analyses.

(e) In the absence of a specific valuation requirement or if a specific valuation requirement in the valuation manual is not, in the opinion of the commissioner, in compliance with, or conflicts with, this code, then the company shall, with respect to those requirements, comply with the minimum valuation standards prescribed by the code or by the commissioner by regulation or bulletin.

(f) The commissioner may engage a qualified actuary, at the expense of the company, to perform an actuarial examination of the company and opine on the appropriateness of any reserve assumption or method used by the company, or to review and opine on a company’s compliance with any requirement set forth in this article. The commissioner may rely upon the opinion, regarding the provisions contained within this article, of a qualified actuary engaged by the commissioner of another state, district, or territory of the United States. As used in this subdivision, the term “engage” includes employment and contracting.

(g) The commissioner may require a company to change any assumption or method that in the opinion of the commissioner is necessary in order to comply with the requirements of the valuation manual or this article, and the company shall adjust the reserves as required by the commissioner. The commissioner may take other
 disciplinary action as permitted pursuant to all other applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 210.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.97.

(a) A company shall establish reserves using a principle-based valuation that meets the following conditions for policies or contracts as specified in the valuation manual:

(1) Quantify the benefits, guarantees, and the funding associated with the contracts and their risks at a level of conservatism that reflects conditions that include unfavorable events that have a reasonable probability of occurring during the lifetime of the contracts. For policies or contracts with significant tail risk, reflects conditions appropriately adverse to quantify the tail risk.

(2) Incorporate assumptions, risk analysis methods, and financial models and
 management techniques that are consistent with, but not necessarily identical to, those utilized within the company’s overall risk assessment process, while recognizing potential differences in financial reporting structures and any prescribed assumptions or methods.

(3) Incorporate assumptions that are derived in one of the following manners:

(A) The assumption is prescribed in the valuation manual.

(B) For assumptions that are not prescribed, the assumptions shall:

(i) Be established utilizing the company’s available experience, to the extent it is relevant and statistically credible.

(ii) To the extent that company data is not available, relevant, or statistically credible, be
 established utilizing other relevant, statistically credible experience.

(4) Provide margins for uncertainty, including adverse deviation and estimation error, such that the greater the uncertainty the larger the margin and resulting reserve.

(b) A company using a principle-based valuation for one or more policies or contracts subject to this section as specified in the valuation manual shall do the following:

(1) Establish procedures for corporate governance and oversight of the actuarial valuation function consistent with those described in the valuation manual.

(2) Provide to the commissioner and the board of directors of the company an annual certification of the effectiveness of the internal controls with respect to the principle-based valuation.
 The controls shall be designed to ensure that all material risks inherent in the liabilities and associated assets subject to such valuation are included in the valuation, and that valuations are made in accordance with the valuation manual. The certification shall be based on the controls in place as of the end of the preceding calendar year.

(3) Develop, and file with the commissioner upon request, a principle-based valuation report that complies with standards prescribed in the valuation manual.

(c) A principle-based valuation may include a prescribed formulaic reserve component.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 21.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.98.

A company shall submit mortality, morbidity, policyholder behavior, or expense experience and other data as prescribed in the valuation manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 22.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.99.

(a) For purposes of this section, “confidential information” means:

(1) A memorandum in support of an opinion submitted pursuant to Section 10489.15 and any other documents, materials, and other information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the memorandum.

(2) All documents, materials, and other information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the
 course of an examination made under subdivision (f) of Section 10489.96. However, if an examination report or other material prepared in connection with an examination made under Article 4 (commencing with Section 729) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 is not held as private and confidential information under that article, an examination report or other material prepared in connection with an examination made under subdivision (f) of Section 10489.96 shall not be “confidential information” to the same extent as if the examination report or other material had been prepared under Article 4 (commencing with Section 729) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(3) Any reports, documents, materials, and other information developed by a company in support of, or in connection with, an annual certification by the company under paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 10489.97 evaluating the effectiveness of the company’s internal controls with respect to a principle-based valuation and any other documents, materials, and other
 information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with those reports, documents, materials, and other information.

(4) Any principle-based valuation report developed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10489.97 and any other documents, materials, and other information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the report.

(5) All of the following:

(A) Any documents, materials, data, and other information submitted by a company
 pursuant to Section 10489.98, to be known collectively, as “experience data.”

(B) Experience data plus any other documents, materials, data, and other information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created or produced in connection with the experience data, in each case that includes any potentially company-identifying or personally identifiable information, that is provided to or obtained by the commissioner, to be known, collectively, as “experience materials.”

(C) Any other documents, materials, data, and other information, including, but not limited to, all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced, or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the experience materials. 

(b) (1) Except as provided in this section, a company’s confidential information shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action. However, the commissioner is authorized to use the confidential information in a regulatory or legal action brought against the company as a part of the commissioner’s official duties.

(2) The commissioner, any person who received confidential information while acting under the authority of the commissioner, or any person with whom those documents,
 materials, or other information are shared pursuant to paragraph (3), shall not be permitted or required to testify in a private civil action concerning any confidential information.

(3) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s duties, the commissioner may share confidential information with the following recipients, provided that the recipient agrees, and has the legal authority to agree, to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the documents, materials, data, and other information in the same manner and to the same extent as required for the commissioner:

(A) Other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies and with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries.

(B) In
 the case of confidential information specified in paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 10489.99 only, with the Actuarial Board for Counseling and Discipline or its successor upon request stating that the confidential information is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and with state, federal, and international law enforcement officials.

(4) The commissioner may receive documents, materials, data, and other information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, data, or information, from the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, from regulatory or law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and from the Actuarial Board for Counseling and Discipline or its successor and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, data,
 or other information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or other information.

(5) The commissioner may enter into agreements governing sharing and use of information consistent with this subdivision.

(6) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the information shall not occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in paragraph (3).

(7) A privilege established under the law of any state or jurisdiction that is substantially similar to the privilege established under this subdivision shall be available and
 enforced in any proceeding in, and in any court of, this state.

(8) For purposes of this section, “regulatory agency,” “law enforcement agency,” and the “NAIC” include, but are not limited to, their employees, agents, consultants, and contractors.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any confidential information specified in paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a):

(1) May be subject to subpoena for the purpose of defending an action seeking damages from the appointed actuary submitting the related memorandum in support of an opinion submitted under Section 10489.15 or principle-based valuation report developed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10489.97 by reason of an action required by this article or
 by regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

(2) May otherwise be released by the commissioner with the written consent of the company.

(3) Once any portion of a memorandum in support of an opinion submitted under Section 10489.15 or a principle-based valuation report developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10489.97 is cited by the company in its marketing or is publicly volunteered to or before a governmental agency other than a state insurance department or is released by the company to the news media, all portions of the memorandum or report shall no longer be confidential.

(d) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of access to, or prohibit the admissibility
 as evidence in a private civil action of, any information, documents, data, or other materials not held for the purposes of this article by the commissioner or a person acting under the authority of the commissioner, including nondepartment actuaries and other consultants hired to implement this article, or a person with whom the commissioner has shared confidential information pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 312.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.992.

(a) (1) The commissioner may hire and assign department staff, and retain nondepartment actuaries and other consultants, to assist the commissioner with preparing to implement and implementing, directly or indirectly, principle-based valuation.

(2) There is in state government the Office of Principle-Based Reserving within the department. The commissioner may select, for the Governor’s appointment, a person to serve as the head of the office, who is an expert in preparing to implement and implementing, directly or indirectly, principle-based valuation. The position occupied by that person shall be an exempt gubernatorial appointment within the department exempt from the state
 civil service system within the meaning of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution. The person’s salary or compensation shall be fixed by the commissioner and effective and payable without approval of the Department of Human Resources, pursuant to Section 19825 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may annually assess all companies that are subject to this article to defray costs the department incurs preparing to implement and implementing, directly or indirectly, principle-based valuation, including, but not limited to, department salaries and overhead, and actuary and consultant fees and expenses.

(2) The commissioner shall annually set an “aggregate assessment amount” and an assessment amount for each tier listed in paragraph (4). The aggregate assessment amount shall be the amount necessary to
 provide sufficient moneys to carry out the projected workload to implement, directly or indirectly, principle-based valuation. The annual aggregate assessment amount shall be no less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) At least 90 days before finalizing the annual aggregate assessment amount and assessment amount for the tiers listed in paragraph (4), the commissioner shall provide notice of the commissioner’s preliminary determination of those amounts. The notice shall explain how the commissioner derived the amounts and provide no less than 45 days for interested parties to provide comments.

(4) Not less than 45 days after the due date for comments specified in paragraph (3), the commissioner shall by bulletin establish the annual aggregate assessment amount according to the company’s annual premium based on the below tiers. For purposes of this section, “annual premium”
 shall mean the gross annual life insurance premium written by a company in California during the immediately preceding year as reported in its annual statutory financial statement. The commissioner may adjust the initial assessment amount for each tier to ensure a sufficient annual aggregate assessment amount as defined in paragraph (2) if he or she adopts a change to the valuation manual pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 10489.96 that warrants the adjustment, and provides an accounting explaining the need for the adjustment.Annual PremiumInitial Annual Assessment Per Company$500,000,001 +$75,000$400,000,001 - $500,000,000$50,000$300,000,001 - $400,000,000$40,000$200,000,001 - $300,000,000$30,000$150,000,001 - $200,000,000$20,000$100,000,001 - $150,000,000$10,000$50,000,001 - $100,000,000$5,000

(5) All examinations and analyses of reserves and principle-based valuation methodologies performed pursuant to Section 730 may be at the expense of the company, organization, or person examined, pursuant to Section 736.

(c) Before retaining an independent actuary or consultant under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the commissioner shall require a written declaration by the actuary or consultant that:

(1) The actuary shall not disclose to another party, other than the department, and shall protect from unauthorized use, any confidential information, as defined in Section 10489.99, obtained in the course of his or her work for the commissioner, unless authorized to do so by the commissioner or required by law.

(2) The actuary or consultant shall not disclose to another party and shall protect from unauthorized use, all confidential information obtained from the department in the course of his or her work for the commissioner.

(d) Before retaining an independent actuary or
 consultant under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the commissioner shall require a written declaration by the actuary or consultant that:

(1) The actuary or consultant will not perform professional services involving an actual or potential conflict of interest unless all of the following are satisfied:

(A) The actuary’s or consultant’s ability to perform the services fairly is unimpaired.

(B) There has been disclosure of the conflict to all present, or known prospective, clients or employers of the actuary or consultant whose interests would be affected by the conflict.

(C) All present, or known prospective, clients or employers of the actuary or consultant have expressly agreed to the performance of the services by the actuary or consultant.

(2) The actuary or actuarial firm with which the actuary is affiliated was not involved in developing the reserves or principle-based valuation methodology under consideration by the actuary.

(3) The actuary or consultant has disclosed any financial interest in the companies whose reserves or principle-based valuation methodologies may be affected by the actuary’s or consultant’s services.

(e) The commissioner may develop and amend regulations to implement or modify subdivisions (c) and (d). The initial adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary in order to address a situation calling for immediate action to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Any emergency regulation adopted or amended by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be adopted
 or amended in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall remain in effect for 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 24.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Qualifications and Exemptions [10490. - 10505.1.]

10490.

This article is applicable only to life and disability insurance. Except as otherwise expressly permitted by this code or when transacted pursuant to or expressly exempted by this article, life or disability insurance shall not be transacted in this State by any person other than a corporation. A person shall not transact life or disability insurance in this State except pursuant to a valid and unrevoked certificate of authority issued by the commissioner or, after registration with the commissioner, under a valid and unrevoked certificate of exemption issued by the commissioner pursuant to this article. Any person subject to or exempted from Chapter 10 of this part is also
 exempted from this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 957.)
-------------------------------------------

10490.1.

Any nonprofit incorporated or unincorporated mutual benefit association in existence prior to January 1, 1945, which confines its membership to officers and employees of a common employer or group of affiliated or related employers including persons who were such officers or employees at the time of becoming members and which pays death benefits only to nominees or the estates of deceased members, or pays disability benefits in amounts not exceeding (except in the case of unemployment compensation disability benefits under the provisions of the Unemployment Insurance Act) one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in the aggregate in any one calendar year on account of
 the disability of any one person, or which pays both such benefits is exempt from the provisions of this code relating to such life insurance in respect to such members and to such disability insurance in respect to such members and their dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1392.)
-------------------------------------------

10490.2.

If an association described in Section 10490.1 has operated pursuant thereto since January 1, 1945, it may procure a certificate of exemption from the commissioner upon meeting all of the requirements of this article relating thereto except those of Section 10494. Thereafter such association shall be subject to:

(a) All of the requirements of this article relating to an association holding a certificate of exemption except Section 10494, and

(b) The limitations of Section 10490.1, except that it may pay disability benefits in amounts not
 exceeding three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600) in the aggregate in any one calendar year on account of the disability of any one person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1356.)
-------------------------------------------

10491.

Persons possessing a valid and unrevoked certificate of authority to transact life or disability or life and disability insurance issued by the commissioner are not subject to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

10492.

Any incorporated or unincorporated benefit and relief association organized on or after January 15, 1951, of either nonprofit or charitable character may, if it complies with the requirements of Section 10493(c)(1), (2), (3), or (6) and the other requirements of this article, procure a certificate of exemption from the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

10493.

An incorporated or unincorporated benefit and relief association organized before January 15, 1951, may procure a certificate of exemption from the commissioner if it complies with all of the following:

(a) All of the other requirements of this article.

(b) As respects life or disability or life and disability insurance transacted by it, it is of an entirely nonprofit nature.

(c) Any one of the following requirements as to membership and purpose:

(1) It is composed of and its membership limited to the appointive officers, employees, and pupils of a public school district or of the appointive
 officers, employees, and pupils of any private school.

(2) It is composed of and its membership limited to the appointive officers and employees of a municipal playground system, or the systems of two or more municipalities united in a league, federation, or other association for the purpose of promoting intercity competitions or other activities, or the participants in dancing, recreational, sporting, educational, social or theatrical activities sponsored or directed by that system or systems and carried on through the use of any of the facilities of that system or systems.

(3) Its membership in this state is 1,000 or more and it is either an organization of a purely religious or benevolent character or its membership is limited to the members of that organization.

(4) It is composed of and its membership is limited
 to the members of another organization and that other organization is of a purely religious or benevolent character and has a total membership in this state of not less than 1,000.

(5) It is a domestic organization, lodge, society, or order that before September 19, 1947, provided life or disability benefits or both of those benefits to its members and is both of the following:

(A) It is of a charitable, benevolent, or beneficent character or becomes so within one year from September 4, 1951, and in both instances is thereafter of that character.

(B) It operates in a manner so that the payment of the benefits even though it be one of the express purposes of that organization, lodge, or order, is as a matter of fact incidental to its charitable, benevolent, or beneficent purposes or within one year from September 4,
 1951, operates in that manner and in both instances thereafter operates in that manner.

(6) Officers and employees of a common employer, and related dependents of those officers and employees, comprising spouses and dependent children who are not married or in registered domestic partnerships and are under 19 years of age, and living in the same household.

(d) Pays a filing fee in the amount of one thousand six hundred ninety-three dollars ($1,693).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 157.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.

Such a benefit and relief association shall not provide for payment of a death benefit of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or for disability benefits of more than five hundred dollars ($500) to any one person in any one period of 12 consecutive months and shall not issue to its members a policy or benefit certificate or any other evidence of benefits except that found in the articles of the association or the bylaws thereof. However, a benefit and relief association described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10493 may provide for a death
 benefit up to two thousand dollars ($2,000), disability benefits up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or insurance protection for medical and hospital expenses up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or any combination or all thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 368, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.2.

Any incorporated or unincorporated benefit and relief association, the membership and insurance in which are restricted to the ministers, priests, rabbis, rectors, vicars, pastors, or readers of any conference, presbytery, diocese, convention or synod or any other similar body of a religious organization (a portion of whose territory is located in the State of California) and the employees of such religious body may procure a certificate of exemption from the commissioner if it does not provide for a death benefit (life and/or accidental death insurance) greater than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or a disability benefit greater than two thousand dollars ($2,000), payable in
 any 12-month period; provided it complies with all applicable provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.5.

Any employer maintaining a plan for furnishing disability insurance benefits to his employees for nonindustrial and nonoccupational injuries or sickness, under which plan the employer defrays 50 percent or more of the expense of such benefits, may secure a certificate of exemption from the commissioner under this article if such employer in respect to such plan otherwise complies with and is subject to the requirements of this article. Such compliance with this article need be only with respect to such plan and not in respect to other business of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 957.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.6.

Any employer who qualifies for a certificate of exemption under Section 10494.5 by virtue of which certificate he or she maintains a plan for furnishing disability benefits to his or her employees may, if he or she elects, make available for the related dependents of his or her employees, comprising spouses and dependent children who are not married or in registered domestic partnerships living in the same household, a supplemental plan of disability benefits containing any or all of the following benefits, hospital, surgical and medical; provided, that as to the supplemental plan the Insurance Commissioner finds that all of the following exist:

(a) The supplemental plan shall be separately stated,
 setting out all of the provisions of coverage.

(b) The plan shall set out the respective contributions of the employer and employees. All contributions of employees received or retained by the employer shall be trust funds and shall be separately accounted for by the employer and may not inure to the benefit of the employer in any manner whatsoever.

(c) The plan permits the disabled individual a free choice of physician and surgeon, or podiatrist in the case of those services that are within the scope of practice of podiatric medicine, as defined in Section 2472 of the Business and Professions Code, and hospital.

(d) The employer agrees to assume 50 percent of the cost of maintaining the plan, and he or she further agrees to guarantee the benefits if the contributions required for the supplementary benefits are not
 sufficient to pay the cost of same. The funds necessary to discharge the employer’s 50 percent assumption shall be trust funds and shall be separately accounted for by him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 61.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.7.

With respect to the supplemental plan described in Section 10494.6, the commissioner may, in addition to the regulations permitted by Section 10498.6, promulgate other reasonable regulations covering all matters set forth in Section 10494.6 and this section. The commissioner shall require each employer making available such supplemental plan to post with him security in the form of a bond of an admitted surety insurer conditioned on the payment by the employer of his obligations under the entire plan or of deposits with the commissioner of securities approved by him to secure the payment of such obligations. Such security shall be equal to the greater of (a) twenty-five
 thousand dollars ($25,000), (b) the estimated contributions of the employees under the entire plan for the ensuing year, (c) the contributions paid by the employees under the entire plan during the preceding year, or (d) one-half of all of the amounts of benefit either paid or incurred by the employer under the entire plan during the preceding year.

If, on examination or investigation of any plan which includes benefits for dependents, the commissioner finds that the aggregate of the trust funds separately held for the supplemental plan and the security in the form hereinabove described may not, in his judgment, be adequate to guarantee the payment of outstanding and incurred liabilities of the entire plan, he may require the employer to post such additional security as will, in his judgment, be adequate to guarantee the payment of all outstanding and incurred liabilities of the entire plan, and, if the employer fails to post such additional security, he may revoke
 the employer’s certificate of exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1811.)
-------------------------------------------

10495.

A certificate of exemption may be procured from the commissioner by filing with him or her certified copies of the articles of incorporation, association, bylaws, rules and regulations, or other organization or governing documents of the applicant together with certified copies of any evidences of insurance which it may issue and a statement of the operations of the applicant. There shall also be filed with the application a statement of the financial condition and income and disbursement exhibit of the applicant in such form as the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, find necessary in order to determine whether the applicant complies with the
 applicable requirements of this article. The commissioner may, pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 730) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, require from any person transacting life or disability insurance, whether or not an applicant for a certificate of exemption, such information as will enable him or her to determine whether or not the person is transacting life or disability insurance in conformity with or in violation of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

10496.

Any person transacting life or disability insurance without a certificate of authority so to do issued by the commissioner shall not give, allow, or promise to give or allow any compensation for procuring new members. “Compensation”, as used herein, is confined to a payment, percentage, bonus, or monetary credit given, promised, or allowed for the securing of new members which, directly or by any arrangement, understanding, or device, is based, in whole or in part, upon the number of new members or reinstatements procured, or the nominal or contingent value of their certificates or policies, or the net or gross amount of dues or premiums paid or payable
 by them or upon any other variable result or contingency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 108.)
-------------------------------------------

10497.

If the commissioner finds that an applicant for a certificate of exemption meets the applicable requirements of this article and those requirements of this code, made applicable to such an applicant by this article, and that the applicant is not formed, conducted or operated for profit or as a commercial insurance enterprise for the benefit of any group or person rather than the relatively equal benefit of its members, he shall register the applicant and issue to it a certificate of exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 957.)
-------------------------------------------

10498.

An applicant for a certificate of exemption must comply with, and the possessor of a certificate of exemption is subject to, the following provisions of this code:

Sections 1 to 41, inclusive;

Chapter 1, Part 1, Division 1;

Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 1;

Article 1, Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 1;

Article 3, Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 1;

Chapter 9, Part 1, Division 1;

Sections 10110, 10111, 10112 and 10114;

Article 4, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 6, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 8, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 9, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 14, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 15, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 17, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 1, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 2, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 3, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 4, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 7, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1;

Article 2, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2;

Article 4, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2;

Article 5, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2;

Section 10270.98;

Chapter 3, Part 2, Division 2;

Article 1, Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 2;

Division 3.

Applicants for and possessors of certificates of exemption not organized or incorporated under the laws of this State in lieu of meeting the requirements of Article 7, Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1, and Articles 1, 2, 4, 5, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2, shall conform to such reasonable investment standards as the commissioner prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10498.5.

If a holder of a certificate of exemption receives or maintains funds for any purpose other than administering and providing the benefits that make it subject to this article, it shall segregate and maintain separately all funds received by it for the purpose of administering and providing such benefits.

When so segregated and maintained separately such benefit funds are not subject to enforcement of a money judgment or other process by or on behalf of creditors of the holder of a certificate of exemption, except that such funds are subject to enforcement of a claim for benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 128.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

10498.6.

The commissioner may from time to time issue regulations which shall govern persons holding certificates of exemption under this article, setting forth financial and other standards which, in his opinion, are required to avoid a condition of hazard, and further specifying the requirements of submission of statements of financial condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

10499.

The commissioner may at any time notify any person possessing a certificate of exemption that the commissioner has grounds to believe that it is violating any of the applicable provisions of this code or is not operating in strict conformity with the documents filed with the commissioner as a basis of its application for the certificate of exemption. The notice shall fix the time and place for hearing at which the person notified may appear and show cause why the commissioner should not revoke its certificate of exemption. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 nor more than 60 days after date of the notice.
